Hawaii statutes.
§577-19 Children prohibited in certain
places, when; penalty. Any keeper of a coffee shop, ice cream parlor,
victualing or billiard saloon, bowling alley, skating rink, theater, show
house, or premises in which any show, moving picture, or other like public
entertainment is given, who permits any child under the age of sixteen years to
be or remain upon the premises or in the saloon, rink, theater, show house, or
premises, or in whose premises such child may be found between the hours of ten
in the evening and six in the morning, unless the child is accompanied by the
child's parent or guardian, or some other adult person thereto authorized by
such parent or guardian, shall be fined not more than $100. [L 1870, c 23, §1;
am L 1915, c 44, §2; RL 1925, §3051; RL 1935, §4533; am L 1943, c 78, pt of §1;
RL 1945, §12285; RL 1955, §330-17; HRS §577-19; am L 1975, c 77, §1(7); gen ch
1985]

Cross References

Purchasing and consumption of alcoholic beverages by minors,
see §281-101.5.

Promoting drugs and intoxicating compounds to minors, see
§§712-1241, 712-1244, 712-1249.5, 712-1249.6, 712-1250, and 712-1250.5.

Sale of tobacco products to minors, see §709-908.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next